Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1403
Employer; prohibited acts.

No employer shall terminate or take any other disciplinary action against
any employee who is a volunteer emergency responder if such employee, when
acting or actively deployed as
a volunteer emergency responder, is absent from or reports late to his or
her place of employment in order to respond to an emergency prior to the time
such employee is to report to his or her place of employment.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB1005, § 2.